Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB261.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 217. Child Support Requirements for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.--(a) The department shall elect the option under 7 CFR 273.11(o) (relating to action on households with special circumstances) to require an individual living with and exercising parental control over a child under eighteen years of age who has an absent parent to cooperate with the department's division of child support services in establishing paternity of the child and in establishing, modifying or enforcing a support order with respect to the child 1234567891011121314151617181920 in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 654(29) (relating to State plan for child and spousal support), in order to be eligible to participate in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.(b) The department shall elect the option under 7 CFR 273.11(p) to require a putative or identified parent of a child under eighteen years of age to cooperate with the department's division of child support services in establishing the paternity of the child and in providing support for the child in order to be eligible to participate in the food stamp program.(c) The inability of the putative or identified parent to comply with the requirement under this section, as determined by the department's division of child support services or an appropriate court of law, shall preclude a determination of ineligibility to participate in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0261PN0209 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516